Vermont, session 2025-2026, H749.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 10 V.S.A. § 2802 is amended to read:
§ 2802. CONSERVATION VISION AND GOALS
(a) The vision of the State of Vermont is to maintain an ecologically
functional landscape that sustains biodiversity, maintains landscape
connectivity, supports watershed health, promotes climate resilience, supports
VT LEG #386423 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.749
2026 Page 2 of 6
working farms and forests, provides opportunities for recreation and
appreciation of the natural world, and supports the historic settlement pattern
of compact villages surrounded by rural lands and natural areas and supports
historic values of working lands, homesteading, conscious capitalism, values-
based industry, and villages providing community center and activity; that its
citizens and its natural resources both prosper by improved access to economic
opportunity, investment in working lands, encouragement of commercial and
industrious activity, and a general ambition to promote a culture of abundance
and generation. It is recognized that as its citizens are empowered to be
productive contributors to a thriving web of communities, an excess of
resources will come to be available to improve the well-being of the entirety of
the State, including the well-being of natural ecosystems, wildlife, and their
habitats, and the restoration of its waterways.
(b) It is the goal of the State that 30 percent of Vermont’s total land area
shall be conserved by 2030, and 50 percent of the State’s total land area shall
be conserved by 2050. The Secretary of Natural Resources shall lead the effort
in achieving these goals. The land conserved shall include State, federal,
municipal, and private land.
(c) Reaching 30 percent by 2030 and 50 percent by 2050 shall include a mix
of ecological reserve areas, biodiversity conservation areas, and natural
resource management areas. In order to support an ecologically functional and
VT LEG #386423 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.749
2026 Page 3 of 6
connected landscape with sustainable production of natural resources and
recreational opportunities, the approximate percentages of each type of
conservation category shall be guided by the principles of conservation science
and the conservation targets within Vermont Conservation Design, prioritizing
ecological reserve areas to protect highest priority natural communities and
maintain or restore old forests.
Sec. 2. 10 V.S.A. § 2804 is amended to read:
§ 2804. CONSERVATION PLAN
* * *
(d) The conserved land inventory established in 2803 of this title shall be
updated biennially to track progress toward meeting the vision and goals of
this chapter, which shall be publicly available, and the Secretary shall submit a
report to the relevant committees on or before January 15 following each
update.
Sec. 3. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 181, Sec. 14 is amended to read:
Sec. 14. CRITERION 8(C) RULEMAKING
(a) The Land Use Review Board (Board), in collaboration with the Agency
of Natural Resources, shall adopt rules to implement the requirements for the
administration of 10 V.S.A. § 6086(a)(8)(C). It is the intent of the General
Assembly that these rules discourage fragmentation of the forest blocks and
habitat connectors by encouraging clustering of development encourage
VT LEG #386423 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.749
2026 Page 4 of 6
conscious development of wildlife habitat while maintaining historic values of
homesteading and agrarian activities. Rules adopted by the Board shall
include:
* * *
(2) Standards establishing how impacts can be avoided or minimized,
including how fragmentation of forest blocks or habitat connectors is avoided
or minimized, which may include steps to promote proactive site design of
buildings, roadways and driveways, utility location, and location relative to
existing features such as roads, tree lines, and fence lines programs to
incentivize conservation of land, enrollment in current use, and collaboration
with local conservation groups. It is the intent of the General Assembly that
the permitting process for single family dwellings, accessory dwellings, and
accessory structures be cost effective and timely. The Land Use Review Board
shall take measures to operate an efficient, organized, and customer-focused
system with regard to any development within the Board’s jurisdiction.
* * *
Sec. 4. 10 V.S.A. § 127 is amended to read:
§ 127. RESOURCE MAPPING
(a) The Secretary of Natural Resources shall complete and maintain
resource mapping based on the Geographic Information System (GIS) or other
technology. The mapping shall identify natural resources throughout the State,
VT LEG #386423 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.749
2026 Page 5 of 6
including forest blocks and habitat connectors, that may be relevant to the
consideration of energy projects and projects subject to chapter 151 of this
title. The Center for Geographic Information shall be available to provide
assistance to the Secretary in carrying out the resource mapping.
(b) The Secretary shall consider the resource maps developed under
subsection (a) of this section when providing evidence and recommendations
to the Public Utility Commission under 30 V.S.A. § 248(b)(5) and when
commenting on or providing recommendations under chapter 151 of this title
to District Commissions on other projects. However, the maps shall only be
advisory and not determinative for regulatory programs, including permits
under chapter 151.
* * *
Sec. 5. REPEAL
10 V.S.A. § 6001(3)(A)(xii) (road jurisdiction) is repealed.
Sec. 6. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 181, Sec. 22 is amended to read:
Sec. 22. TIER 3 RULEMAKING
(a) The Land Use Review Board, in consultation with the Secretary of
Natural Resources, shall adopt rules to implement the requirements for the
administration of 10 V.S.A. § 6001(3)(A)(xiii) and 10 V.S.A. § 6001(46) and
(19). It is the intent of the General Assembly that these rules identify critical
natural resources for protection. The Board shall review the definition of Tier
VT LEG #386423 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.749
2026 Page 6 of 6
3 area; determine the critical natural resources that shall be included in Tier 3,
giving due consideration to river corridors, headwater streams, habitat
connectors of statewide significance, riparian areas, class A waters, and natural
communities; any additional critical natural resources that should be added to
the definition; measures to ensure that no municipality or region is
disproportionately impacted by Tier 3 designation that would limit reasonable
opportunities for Tier 1 or Tier 2 designations; and how to define the
boundaries. Rules adopted by the Board shall include:
* * *
(3) the process for how Tier 3 areas will be mapped or identified by the
Agency of Natural Resources and the Board;
* * *
Sec. 7. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #386423 v.3